src/fst/morphology/incoming/verb_inner_affixes.lexc
Multichar_Symbols @D.OBJECTPERSON@ @D.PREFIX@ @D.SUBJECTPERSON.4@ @D.VALENCE.TRANSITIVE@ @P.DISTRIBUTIVE.OFF@ @P.DISTRIBUTIVE.ON@ @P.PREFIX.MIDDLE@ @R.DISTRIBUTIVE.OFF@ @R.DISTRIBUTIVE.ON@ @R.OBJECTNUMBER.PL@ @R.OBJECTNUMBER.SG@ @R.OBJECTPERSON.1@ @R.OBJECTPERSON.2@ @R.OBJECTPERSON.3@ @R.OBJECTPERSON.4@ @R.OBJECTPERSON.RECIP@ @R.OBJECTPERSON.REFL@ @R.PREFIX.INNER@ @R.PREFIX.MIDDLE@ @R.PREFIX.OUTER@ @R.SUBJECTNUMBER.PL@ @R.SUBJECTNUMBER.SG@ @R.SUBJECTPERSON.3@ @R.SUBJECTPERSON.4@ @R.TAMA.sii@ @U.ASPECT.IPFV@ @U.ASPECT.PFV@ @U.ASPECT.POT@ @U.ASPECT.PROG@ @U.OBJECTNUMBER.PL@ @U.OBJECTNUMBER.SG@ @U.OBJECTPERSON.1@ @U.OBJECTPERSON.2@ @U.OBJECTPERSON.3@ @U.OBJECTPERSON.4@ @U.OBJECTPERSON.RECIP@ @U.OBJECTPERSON.REFL@ @U.PREFIX.OUTER@ @U.SUBJECTNUMBER.PL@ @U.SUBJECTNUMBER.SG@ @U.SUBJECTPERSON.1@ @U.SUBJECTPERSON.2@ @U.SUBJECTPERSON.3@ @U.SUBJECTPERSON.4@ @U.TAMA.%0@ @U.TAMA.%0i@ @U.TAMA.%0s@ @U.TAMA.i@ @U.TAMA.ii@ @U.TAMA.is@ @U.TAMA.isi@ @U.TAMA.isii@ @U.TAMA.isis@ @U.TAMA.ni@ @U.TAMA.nii@ @U.TAMA.nis@ @U.TAMA.si@ @U.TAMA.sii@ @U.TAMA.sis@ @U.TAMA.yi-a@ @U.TAMA.yi-y@ @U.TAMA.yi@ @U.TAMA.yii-a@ @U.TAMA.yii@ @U.TAMA.yis-y@ @U.TAMA.yis@ @U.VALENCE.DITRANSITIVE@ @U.VALENCE.EXPERIENCER@ @U.VALENCE.IMPERSONAL@ @U.VALENCE.INTRANSITIVE@ @U.VALENCE.OBLIQUEOBJECT@ @U.VALENCE.TRANSITIONAL@ @U.VALENCE.TRANSITIVE@


!
! TODO:
!
!   * Once morphophonemic adaptations are in place, make sure they work as
!     expected with all 0i, sii, nii, etc. paradigms and i-IPFV/isis-PFV
!     paradigms (need to make sure that vowel lengths and tone combinations
!     come out properly)
!
!   * Make sure that transitive verb forms are coming out properly (seems
!     likely that this isn't entirely right at the moment, but test and see
!     where this is at)
!
!   * Afterwards, make sure that the morphophonological adjustments needed
!     for vowel sequences are in place (and tested; some preliminary code in
!     verbtest.foma, but further tests for sequences starting with /u/ and
!     /a/ would be particularly helpful)
!


LEXICON Root

0-IPFV ;
ni-IPFV ; 
si-IPFV ;
i-IPFV ;

ni-PFV ;
si-PFV ;
yi-y-PFV ;
yi-a-PFV ;
isi-PFV ;

yi-PROG ;

yi-POT ;


!
! 0-IPFV
!
LEXICON 0-IPFV

@U.ASPECT.IPFV@@U.TAMA.%0@@D.PREFIX@         0-IPFV-AFF-NoPrefix ;
@U.ASPECT.IPFV@@U.TAMA.%0@@R.PREFIX.INNER@   0-IPFV-AFF-InnerPrefix ;
@U.ASPECT.IPFV@@U.TAMA.%0@@R.PREFIX.MIDDLE@  0-IPFV-AFF-InnerPrefix ;
@U.ASPECT.IPFV@@U.TAMA.%0@@R.PREFIX.OUTER@   0-IPFV-AFF-OuterPrefix ;

@U.ASPECT.IPFV@@U.TAMA.%0s@@D.PREFIX@        0s-IPFV-AFF-NoPrefix ;
@U.ASPECT.IPFV@@U.TAMA.%0s@@R.PREFIX.INNER@  0s-IPFV-AFF-InnerPrefix ;
@U.ASPECT.IPFV@@U.TAMA.%0s@@R.PREFIX.MIDDLE@ 0s-IPFV-AFF-InnerPrefix ;
@U.ASPECT.IPFV@@U.TAMA.%0s@@R.PREFIX.OUTER@  0s-IPFV-AFF-OuterPrefix ;

@U.ASPECT.IPFV@@U.TAMA.%0i@@D.PREFIX@        0i-IPFV-AFF-NoPrefix ;
@U.ASPECT.IPFV@@U.TAMA.%0i@@R.PREFIX.INNER@  0i-IPFV-AFF-InnerPrefix ;
@U.ASPECT.IPFV@@U.TAMA.%0i@@R.PREFIX.MIDDLE@ 0i-IPFV-AFF-InnerPrefix ;
@U.ASPECT.IPFV@@U.TAMA.%0i@@R.PREFIX.OUTER@  0i-IPFV-AFF-OuterPrefix ;

LEXICON 0-IPFV-AFF-NoPrefix
@U.SUBJECTPERSON.1@@U.SUBJECTNUMBER.SG@is    #;
@U.SUBJECTPERSON.2@@U.SUBJECTNUMBER.SG@ni    #;
@U.SUBJECTPERSON.3@@U.SUBJECTNUMBER.SG@i     #;
@U.SUBJECTPERSON.1@@U.SUBJECTNUMBER.PL@isaà  #;
@U.SUBJECTPERSON.1@@U.SUBJECTNUMBER.PL@isiì  #;
@U.SUBJECTPERSON.2@@U.SUBJECTNUMBER.PL@aS    #;
@R.SUBJECTPERSON.3@@R.SUBJECTNUMBER.PL@      #;
@R.SUBJECTPERSON.4@@R.SUBJECTNUMBER.SG@      #;

LEXICON 0-IPFV-AFF-InnerPrefix
@U.SUBJECTPERSON.1@@U.SUBJECTNUMBER.SG@is    #;
@U.SUBJECTPERSON.2@@U.SUBJECTNUMBER.SG@í     #;
@U.SUBJECTPERSON.3@@U.SUBJECTNUMBER.SG@i     #;
@U.SUBJECTPERSON.1@@U.SUBJECTNUMBER.PL@aà    #;
@U.SUBJECTPERSON.1@@U.SUBJECTNUMBER.PL@iì    #;
@U.SUBJECTPERSON.2@@U.SUBJECTNUMBER.PL@aS    #;
@R.SUBJECTPERSON.3@@R.SUBJECTNUMBER.PL@      #;
@R.SUBJECTPERSON.4@@R.SUBJECTNUMBER.SG@      #;

LEXICON 0-IPFV-AFF-OuterPrefix
@U.SUBJECTPERSON.1@@U.SUBJECTNUMBER.SG@s     #;
@U.SUBJECTPERSON.2@@U.SUBJECTNUMBER.SG@ni    #;
@U.SUBJECTPERSON.3@@U.SUBJECTNUMBER.SG@      #;
@U.SUBJECTPERSON.1@@U.SUBJECTNUMBER.PL@isaà  #;
@U.SUBJECTPERSON.1@@U.SUBJECTNUMBER.PL@isiì  #;
@U.SUBJECTPERSON.2@@U.SUBJECTNUMBER.PL@S     #;
@R.SUBJECTPERSON.3@@R.SUBJECTNUMBER.PL@      #;
@R.SUBJECTPERSON.4@@R.SUBJECTNUMBER.SG@      #;


LEXICON 0s-IPFV-AFF-NoPrefix
@U.SUBJECTPERSON.1@@U.SUBJECTNUMBER.SG@is    #;
@U.SUBJECTPERSON.2@@U.SUBJECTNUMBER.SG@nis   #;
@U.SUBJECTPERSON.3@@U.SUBJECTNUMBER.SG@is    #;
@U.SUBJECTPERSON.1@@U.SUBJECTNUMBER.PL@isaà  #;
@U.SUBJECTPERSON.1@@U.SUBJECTNUMBER.PL@isiì  #;
@U.SUBJECTPERSON.2@@U.SUBJECTNUMBER.PL@aS    #;
@R.SUBJECTPERSON.3@@R.SUBJECTNUMBER.PL@s     #;
@R.SUBJECTPERSON.4@@R.SUBJECTNUMBER.SG@s     #;

LEXICON 0s-IPFV-AFF-InnerPrefix
@U.SUBJECTPERSON.1@@U.SUBJECTNUMBER.SG@is    #;
@U.SUBJECTPERSON.2@@U.SUBJECTNUMBER.SG@ís    #;
@U.SUBJECTPERSON.3@@U.SUBJECTNUMBER.SG@is    #;
@U.SUBJECTPERSON.1@@U.SUBJECTNUMBER.PL@aà    #;
@U.SUBJECTPERSON.1@@U.SUBJECTNUMBER.PL@iì    #;
@U.SUBJECTPERSON.2@@U.SUBJECTNUMBER.PL@aS    #;
@R.SUBJECTPERSON.3@@R.SUBJECTNUMBER.PL@s     #;
@R.SUBJECTPERSON.4@@R.SUBJECTNUMBER.SG@s     #;

LEXICON 0s-IPFV-AFF-OuterPrefix
@U.SUBJECTPERSON.1@@U.SUBJECTNUMBER.SG@s     #;
@U.SUBJECTPERSON.2@@U.SUBJECTNUMBER.SG@nis   #;
@U.SUBJECTPERSON.3@@U.SUBJECTNUMBER.SG@s     #;
@U.SUBJECTPERSON.1@@U.SUBJECTNUMBER.PL@isaà  #;
@U.SUBJECTPERSON.1@@U.SUBJECTNUMBER.PL@isiì  #;
@U.SUBJECTPERSON.2@@U.SUBJECTNUMBER.PL@S     #;
@R.SUBJECTPERSON.3@@R.SUBJECTNUMBER.PL@s     #;
@R.SUBJECTPERSON.4@@R.SUBJECTNUMBER.SG@s     #;


LEXICON 0i-IPFV-AFF-NoPrefix
@U.SUBJECTPERSON.1@@U.SUBJECTNUMBER.SG@is    #;
@U.SUBJECTPERSON.2@@U.SUBJECTNUMBER.SG@nii   #;
@U.SUBJECTPERSON.3@@U.SUBJECTNUMBER.SG@ii    #;
@U.SUBJECTPERSON.1@@U.SUBJECTNUMBER.PL@isaà  #;
@U.SUBJECTPERSON.1@@U.SUBJECTNUMBER.PL@isiì  #;
@U.SUBJECTPERSON.2@@U.SUBJECTNUMBER.PL@aS    #;
@R.SUBJECTPERSON.3@@R.SUBJECTNUMBER.PL@i     #;
@R.SUBJECTPERSON.4@@R.SUBJECTNUMBER.SG@i     #;

LEXICON 0i-IPFV-AFF-InnerPrefix
@U.SUBJECTPERSON.1@@U.SUBJECTNUMBER.SG@is    #;
@U.SUBJECTPERSON.2@@U.SUBJECTNUMBER.SG@íí    #;
@U.SUBJECTPERSON.3@@U.SUBJECTNUMBER.SG@ii    #;
@U.SUBJECTPERSON.1@@U.SUBJECTNUMBER.PL@aà    #;
@U.SUBJECTPERSON.1@@U.SUBJECTNUMBER.PL@iì    #;
@U.SUBJECTPERSON.2@@U.SUBJECTNUMBER.PL@aS    #;
@R.SUBJECTPERSON.3@@R.SUBJECTNUMBER.PL@ii    #;
@R.SUBJECTPERSON.4@@R.SUBJECTNUMBER.SG@ii    #;

LEXICON 0i-IPFV-AFF-OuterPrefix
@U.SUBJECTPERSON.1@@U.SUBJECTNUMBER.SG@s     #;
@U.SUBJECTPERSON.2@@U.SUBJECTNUMBER.SG@nii   #;
@U.SUBJECTPERSON.3@@U.SUBJECTNUMBER.SG@ìì    #;
@U.SUBJECTPERSON.1@@U.SUBJECTNUMBER.PL@isaà  #;
@U.SUBJECTPERSON.1@@U.SUBJECTNUMBER.PL@isiì  #;
@U.SUBJECTPERSON.2@@U.SUBJECTNUMBER.PL@S     #;
@R.SUBJECTPERSON.3@@R.SUBJECTNUMBER.PL@ii    #;
@R.SUBJECTPERSON.4@@R.SUBJECTNUMBER.SG@ii    #;


!
! ni-IPFV
!
LEXICON ni-IPFV

@U.ASPECT.IPFV@@U.TAMA.ni@@D.PREFIX@         ni-IPFV-AFF-NoPrefix ;
@U.ASPECT.IPFV@@U.TAMA.ni@@R.PREFIX.INNER@   ni-IPFV-AFF-InnerPrefix ;
@U.ASPECT.IPFV@@U.TAMA.ni@@R.PREFIX.MIDDLE@  ni-IPFV-AFF-InnerPrefix ;
@U.ASPECT.IPFV@@U.TAMA.ni@@R.PREFIX.OUTER@   ni-IPFV-AFF-OuterPrefix ;

@U.ASPECT.IPFV@@U.TAMA.nis@@D.PREFIX@        nis-IPFV-AFF-NoPrefix ;
@U.ASPECT.IPFV@@U.TAMA.nis@@R.PREFIX.INNER@  nis-IPFV-AFF-InnerPrefix ;
@U.ASPECT.IPFV@@U.TAMA.nis@@R.PREFIX.MIDDLE@ nis-IPFV-AFF-InnerPrefix ;
@U.ASPECT.IPFV@@U.TAMA.nis@@R.PREFIX.OUTER@  nis-IPFV-AFF-OuterPrefix ;

@U.ASPECT.IPFV@@U.TAMA.nii@@D.PREFIX@        nii-IPFV-AFF-NoPrefix ;
@U.ASPECT.IPFV@@U.TAMA.nii@@R.PREFIX.INNER@  nii-IPFV-AFF-InnerPrefix ;
@U.ASPECT.IPFV@@U.TAMA.nii@@R.PREFIX.MIDDLE@ nii-IPFV-AFF-InnerPrefix ;
@U.ASPECT.IPFV@@U.TAMA.nii@@R.PREFIX.OUTER@  nii-IPFV-AFF-OuterPrefix ;

LEXICON ni-IPFV-AFF-NoPrefix
@U.SUBJECTPERSON.1@@U.SUBJECTNUMBER.SG@nis   #;
@U.SUBJECTPERSON.2@@U.SUBJECTNUMBER.SG@ní    #;
@U.SUBJECTPERSON.3@@U.SUBJECTNUMBER.SG@ni    #;
@U.SUBJECTPERSON.1@@U.SUBJECTNUMBER.PL@naà   #;
@U.SUBJECTPERSON.1@@U.SUBJECTNUMBER.PL@niì   #;
@U.SUBJECTPERSON.2@@U.SUBJECTNUMBER.PL@naS   #;
@R.SUBJECTPERSON.3@@R.SUBJECTNUMBER.PL@      #;
@R.SUBJECTPERSON.4@@R.SUBJECTNUMBER.SG@      #;

LEXICON ni-IPFV-AFF-InnerPrefix
@U.SUBJECTPERSON.1@@U.SUBJECTNUMBER.SG@nis   #;
@U.SUBJECTPERSON.2@@U.SUBJECTNUMBER.SG@ní    #;
@U.SUBJECTPERSON.3@@U.SUBJECTNUMBER.SG@      #;
@U.SUBJECTPERSON.1@@U.SUBJECTNUMBER.PL@naà   #;
@U.SUBJECTPERSON.1@@U.SUBJECTNUMBER.PL@niì   #;
@U.SUBJECTPERSON.2@@U.SUBJECTNUMBER.PL@naS   #;
@R.SUBJECTPERSON.3@@R.SUBJECTNUMBER.PL@      #;
@R.SUBJECTPERSON.4@@R.SUBJECTNUMBER.SG@      #;

LEXICON ni-IPFV-AFF-OuterPrefix
@U.SUBJECTPERSON.1@@U.SUBJECTNUMBER.SG@nis   #;
@U.SUBJECTPERSON.2@@U.SUBJECTNUMBER.SG@ní    #;
@U.SUBJECTPERSON.3@@U.SUBJECTNUMBER.SG@      #;
@U.SUBJECTPERSON.1@@U.SUBJECTNUMBER.PL@naà   #;
@U.SUBJECTPERSON.1@@U.SUBJECTNUMBER.PL@niì   #;
@U.SUBJECTPERSON.2@@U.SUBJECTNUMBER.PL@naS   #;
@R.SUBJECTPERSON.3@@R.SUBJECTNUMBER.PL@      #;
@R.SUBJECTPERSON.4@@R.SUBJECTNUMBER.SG@      #;


LEXICON nis-IPFV-AFF-NoPrefix
@U.SUBJECTPERSON.1@@U.SUBJECTNUMBER.SG@nis   #;
@U.SUBJECTPERSON.2@@U.SUBJECTNUMBER.SG@nís   #;
@U.SUBJECTPERSON.3@@U.SUBJECTNUMBER.SG@nis   #;
@U.SUBJECTPERSON.1@@U.SUBJECTNUMBER.PL@naà   #;
@U.SUBJECTPERSON.1@@U.SUBJECTNUMBER.PL@niì   #;
@U.SUBJECTPERSON.2@@U.SUBJECTNUMBER.PL@naS   #;
@R.SUBJECTPERSON.3@@R.SUBJECTNUMBER.PL@s     #;
@R.SUBJECTPERSON.4@@R.SUBJECTNUMBER.SG@s     #;

LEXICON nis-IPFV-AFF-InnerPrefix
@U.SUBJECTPERSON.1@@U.SUBJECTNUMBER.SG@nis   #;
@U.SUBJECTPERSON.2@@U.SUBJECTNUMBER.SG@nís   #;
@U.SUBJECTPERSON.3@@U.SUBJECTNUMBER.SG@is    #;
@U.SUBJECTPERSON.1@@U.SUBJECTNUMBER.PL@naà   #;
@U.SUBJECTPERSON.1@@U.SUBJECTNUMBER.PL@niì   #;
@U.SUBJECTPERSON.2@@U.SUBJECTNUMBER.PL@naS   #;
@R.SUBJECTPERSON.3@@R.SUBJECTNUMBER.PL@s     #;
@R.SUBJECTPERSON.4@@R.SUBJECTNUMBER.SG@s     #;

LEXICON nis-IPFV-AFF-OuterPrefix
@U.SUBJECTPERSON.1@@U.SUBJECTNUMBER.SG@nis   #;
@U.SUBJECTPERSON.2@@U.SUBJECTNUMBER.SG@nís   #;
@U.SUBJECTPERSON.3@@U.SUBJECTNUMBER.SG@s     #;
@U.SUBJECTPERSON.1@@U.SUBJECTNUMBER.PL@naà   #;
@U.SUBJECTPERSON.1@@U.SUBJECTNUMBER.PL@niì   #;
@U.SUBJECTPERSON.2@@U.SUBJECTNUMBER.PL@naS   #;
@R.SUBJECTPERSON.3@@R.SUBJECTNUMBER.PL@s     #;
@R.SUBJECTPERSON.4@@R.SUBJECTNUMBER.SG@s     #;


LEXICON nii-IPFV-AFF-NoPrefix
! FIXME: no documentation for this form; dummy values below
@U.SUBJECTPERSON.1@@U.SUBJECTNUMBER.SG@nis   #;
@U.SUBJECTPERSON.2@@U.SUBJECTNUMBER.SG@nii   #;
@U.SUBJECTPERSON.3@@U.SUBJECTNUMBER.SG@ii    #;
@U.SUBJECTPERSON.1@@U.SUBJECTNUMBER.PL@naà   #;
@U.SUBJECTPERSON.1@@U.SUBJECTNUMBER.PL@niì   #;
@U.SUBJECTPERSON.2@@U.SUBJECTNUMBER.PL@naS   #;
@R.SUBJECTPERSON.3@@R.SUBJECTNUMBER.PL@ii    #;
@R.SUBJECTPERSON.4@@R.SUBJECTNUMBER.SG@ii    #;

LEXICON nii-IPFV-AFF-InnerPrefix
@U.SUBJECTPERSON.1@@U.SUBJECTNUMBER.SG@nis   #;
@U.SUBJECTPERSON.2@@U.SUBJECTNUMBER.SG@níí   #;
@U.SUBJECTPERSON.3@@U.SUBJECTNUMBER.SG@ii    #;
@U.SUBJECTPERSON.1@@U.SUBJECTNUMBER.PL@naà   #;
@U.SUBJECTPERSON.1@@U.SUBJECTNUMBER.PL@niì   #;
@U.SUBJECTPERSON.2@@U.SUBJECTNUMBER.PL@naS   #;
@R.SUBJECTPERSON.3@@R.SUBJECTNUMBER.PL@ii    #;
@R.SUBJECTPERSON.4@@R.SUBJECTNUMBER.SG@ii    #;

LEXICON nii-IPFV-AFF-OuterPrefix
@U.SUBJECTPERSON.1@@U.SUBJECTNUMBER.SG@nis   #;
@U.SUBJECTPERSON.2@@U.SUBJECTNUMBER.SG@níí   #;
@U.SUBJECTPERSON.3@@U.SUBJECTNUMBER.SG@ìì    #;
@U.SUBJECTPERSON.1@@U.SUBJECTNUMBER.PL@naà   #;
@U.SUBJECTPERSON.1@@U.SUBJECTNUMBER.PL@niì   #;
@U.SUBJECTPERSON.2@@U.SUBJECTNUMBER.PL@naS   #;
@R.SUBJECTPERSON.3@@R.SUBJECTNUMBER.PL@ii    #;
@R.SUBJECTPERSON.4@@R.SUBJECTNUMBER.SG@ii    #;
